Utah statutes.
67-4-18.   Housing Relief Restricted Special Revenue Fund -- Payments to Utah Housing Corporation.

(1)  As used in this section, "fund" means the Housing Relief Restricted Special Revenue Fund created by this section.

(2)  There is created the Housing Relief Restricted Special Revenue Fund.

(3)  The fund shall be comprised of money deposited in the fund from money received as a result of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

(4)  Money in the fund shall be expended to fund grants to be made by the Utah Housing Corporation in accordance with Section 9-4-927.

(5)  The treasurer may place funds in an escrow account, upon which the Utah Housing Corporation may draw to make grants in accordance with Section 9-4-927.

(6)  The treasurer may use money from the fund to pay the costs of escrow and other expenses of the corporation in connection with its duties under Section 9-4-927.

(7)  The treasurer shall administer the fund and make payments from the fund in accordance with this section and Section 9-4-927.

